languages/hyph-hu.tex
% from https://github.com/nagybence/huhyphn/
% ------------------------------------------
% Huhyphn - hungarian hyphenation patterns v20110815
%
% ***** BEGIN LICENSE BLOCK *****
% Version: MPL 1.1/GPL 2.0/LGPL 2.1
%
% The contents of this file are subject to the Mozilla Public License Version
% 1.1 (the "License"); you may not use this file except in compliance with
% the License. You may obtain a copy of the License at
% http://www.mozilla.org/MPL/
%
% Software distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" basis,
% WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, either express or implied. See the License
% for the specific language governing rights and limitations under the
% License.
%
% The Original Code is the Huhyphn - hungarian hyphenation patterns.
%
% The Initial Developer of the Original Code is
% Bence Nagy.
% Portions created by the Initial Developer are Copyright (C) 2003
% the Initial Developer. All Rights Reserved.
%
% Contributor(s):
%   Bence Nagy <bence.nagy@gmail.com>
%
% Alternatively, the contents of this file may be used under the terms of
% either the GNU General Public License Version 2 or later (the "GPL"), or
% the GNU Lesser General Public License Version 2.1 or later (the "LGPL"),
% in which case the provisions of the GPL or the LGPL are applicable instead
% of those above. If you wish to allow use of your version of this file only
% under the terms of either the GPL or the LGPL, and not to allow others to
% use your version of this file under the terms of the MPL, indicate your
% decision by deleting the provisions above and replace them with the notice
% and other provisions required by the GPL or the LGPL. If you do not delete
% the provisions above, a recipient may use your version of this file under
% the terms of any one of the MPL, the GPL or the LGPL.
%
% ***** END LICENSE BLOCK *****
%
% Encoding: UTF8
%
\message{Huhyphn - hungarian hyphenation patterns v20110815}
\patterns{%
.a2
.adatát1a2
.ada2t1e2
.adás1s
.adá2s3z
.ad1yé.
.ad1yi
.ag1os
.ag2ra
.agyag1g
.agy1á2ram
.agy1árt
.agy1e2
.agyo2
.agyon1
.agy1ó2
.agy1ű2
.akác1c
.aká2cs
.ak2h
.ako2
.ak2t1ér.
.ak2t1orr
.ak2t1ő2
.aku1p2
.ala2g1
.alak1a2
.ala2k1ö2
.ala2k1ő2
.ala2pa
.ala2p1á
.al1eg
.al1is
.al2járn
.alje2
.al2j1el
.aljel1ö2
.alo2m1
.al1os
.al2t1a2k
.al2t1erj
.al2tén
.al2térn
.al2tért
.al2tin
.am1ak
.ango2l1ó2
.an1th
.anti1s
.apa1p2
.apá2ly1á2z
.ara2ny1e2
.ara2sze
.ar1á2c
.ar2cal
.arc3c
.ar2c1e2
.ar2cél
.ar2c3há
.ar2c3hoz
.ar2cin
.ar2cio
.ar2col
.ar2cö
.ar2c3s
.ar1kh
.at2h
.az1a2
.az1ám
.aze2
.az1ó2
.á2
.ács1ék
.ág1árn
.ág1árt
.ág1ó2
.ágy1ala
.ágy1asz
.ágy1árt
.ágy1á2z
.ál1a2
.ál1é
.ál1i2
.áligaz1
.ál2l1alj
.ál2l1alt
.ál2lin
.ál1o2k
.ál1ú
.ár1aj
.ár1aktá
.ár1a2l
.ára2m1e
.ár1a2p
.ára2sz
.ár1aszó
.ár1ác
.ár1ál
.ár1á2z
.ár1d2
.áre2
.ár1em
.áré2
.ár1ir
.ár2nyel
.ár1ol
.ár1om
.ár1os
.árrés1s
.ár1s2
.ár1t2r
.ász1ál
.ász1árb
.ász1á2ré
.ász1á2ri
.ász1á2ro
.át1a2d
.át1a2k
.át1alt
.át1a2n
.át1ar
.át1a2s
.át1av
.át1á2
.át1e2
.át1é2
.át1i2
.át1ol
.át1o2r
.át1o2s
.átó2
.át1óh
.át1óv
.át1ö2
.át1u
.át1ü2
.át1ű
.b2
.ba2b1a2rá
.ba2bál
.ba2b1e2
.ba2bol
.ba2j1á2rat
.ba2j1e
.bak1aszt
.ba2kál
.ba2k1á2ro
.baké2
.ba2k1ö2
.ba2kur
.ba2l1e2g
.ba1ts
.ba2u
.bá2l1ó2
.bár1a
.bá1th
.be2at.
.be1d2
.bei2
.be1kr
.be1str
.be1szk
.beté2t1e2l
.be1tr
.bér2c3sí
.bé2r1o
.bi2ke
.bi2os
.bi2ot
.bita2
.bi2tag
.bi2t1á2
.bi2tel
.bi2t1er
.bi2t1orr
.bi2tur
.bo2g1ó2
.bol2ta
.bo2ly1ó2
.bo2nav
.bo2raj
.bo2ran
.bo2ras
.bo2rat
.bo2rác
.bo2rál
.bo2r1odv
.bor2sét
.bort2
.bo2tá
.bra2i
.bu2sz1e
.c2
.cen2t1á
.cen2t1ó2
.ce2t1e2l
.ce2t1ű
.cé2l1e2
.ci2n1á2
.cito1
.cs2
.csa2k1
.csa2p1á2g
.csa2t1é2
.cse2l1ő2r
.d2
.dac1c
.da2c3s
.da2i
.dal1an
.da2lás
.da2l1e2
.da2l1ék
.da2lén
.da2l1í2
.da3lol
.da2l1ó2
.dan1n
.da2u
.den2g1
.dé2la
.dére2
.dé2res
.dé2sa
.di2afo
.di2aka
.di2al
.di2csá
.di2ómá
.dó2mor
.dú2ra
.e2
.eb1eg
.eb1ir
.eb1í
.eb1u2
.eg2é
.egres1s
.egy1a2
.egy1á2
.egy1e2lőr
.egy1ev
.egy1in
.egy1ö2
.egy1ü2l
.el1a2k
.el1an
.el1ap
.ela2s
.el1ass
.el1aszn
.el1aszo
.el1aszv
.el1á2
.el1e2c
.el1eger
.ele2gyá
.el1e2h
.el1ejt
.el1e2l
.ele2ma
.ele2má
.ele2meg
.ele2mel
.el1emele
.el1emels
.el1emelt
.el1e2més
.el1e2n
.el1e2p
.el1e2r
.el1e2se
.el1e2sés
.el1esh
.el1e2si
.el1esn
.el1e2ső
.el1ess
.el1este
.el1estél
.el1estü
.el1e2sü
.el1esv
.el1e2sz
.el1e2t
.el1e2vet
.el1e2vez
.el1evi
.elé2d
.el1éde
.el1é2gek
.el1éh
.el1ékez
.el1é2le
.elé2n
.el1éne
.el1é2p
.el1é2r
.el1é2tet.
.el1é2v
.el1id
.el1ig
.el1i2h
.el1ik
.el1i2mit
.el1in
.el1ir
.el1i2s
.eli2t1o
.el1itta.
.el1itták
.el1izz
.el1í
.ellege2
.elo2
.el1okk
.el1oko
.el1or
.el1ó2
.elö2
.el1ök
.el1öle
.el1ölé
.el1ölh
.el1öli
.el1ölj.
.el1ölje
.el1öljé
.el1öljü
.el1ölne
.el1ölné.
.el1ölném
.el1ölni
.el1ölő
.el1ölt.
.el1ölte
.el1ölté
.el1öltn
.el1öltü
.el1ölün
.el1ölv
.el1öv
.előé2
.el1s2
.el1t2
.el1u
.elü2
.el1ül.
.el1ülh
.el1üli
.el1ülj
.el1üln
.el1ülte
.el1ülv
.el2v1el
.el2v1ég.
.es1er
.ese2tel
.es2t1a
.es2t1á
.es2t1é2ke.
.es2t1é2kek
.et2h
.etilén1g2
.evés1s
.ex1el
.ez1á
.ez1e2l
.é2
.édes3s
.ég1a2
.ég1eg
.ég1e2rei
.ége2s
.ég1esz
.ég1ér.
.ég1é2ré
.ég1érn
.égés3s
.égé2sz
.ég1észb
.ég1észe
.ég1észé
.ég1észn
.ég1észr
.ég1ö2
.ég1u2
.éh1év
.éj1a2
.éj1á2
.éj1el
.éj1u
.ék1a2
.ék1á
.ékes1s
.ék1ir
.ék1o
.él1a2
.él2c1i
.éli2k
.él1ike
.él2v1á2
.ép1es
.ép2pa
.ép2p1el
.ép2pé
.ép2po
.ér1a2n
.ér2c1e2l
.ér2c1é2j
.ér2cék
.ér2c3sí
.ér1e2l
.ér1e2s
.éré2sz
.ér1észé
.ér1é2t
.érü2
.ér1ül
.ér2vad
.ér2val
.ér2v1ég.
.ész1a2l
.ész1á
.észe2
.ész1el
.ész1em
.ész1es
.ész1é2k
.észigaz1
.ész1o
.ész1ő2
.ész2t1örv
.észü2
.ész1ülő
.év1á2g
.év1essz
.év1é2g
.év1é2k
.f2
.fa2it.
.fa2leg
.fa2n1év
.fa2r1ont
.fas2
.fa1st
.fat2
.fa1tr
.fe2leme
.fe2l1essz
.fe2lev
.fé2k1e2l
.fé2m1a2
.fé2m1á2
.fil2méré
.fin2ge
.fogó2s3zá
.fol2t1a2
.fö2lő
.fö2lül.
.fölül1e2
.g2
.ga2zan
.gát1al
.gá2te
.gá2z1ó2
.gázs2
.gá2zsu
.gáz1z
.gene2a
.ge2od
.ge2os
.gesz2t1í
.gé2d1
.gé2na
.gé2ná
.gén3n
.gé2pe2lem
.gé2p1i2p
.giga1s
.gonor1
.gonorr2
.gó2ce
.gó2la
.gó2lá
.gó2lel
.gó2l1e2s
.góli2g
.gó2l1iga
.gó2lis
.gő2z1á2
.gő2zen
.gő2z1ő
.gő2zs
.gu2i
.h2
.ha2b1e2
.ha2b1ol
.ha2bor
.ha2b1ő
.ha2b1u
.ha2dal
.ha2d1e2
.ha2dz
.ha2ik
.ha2j1e2
.ha2jom
.ha2lác
.halá2l1ó2
.ha2lárv
.ha2leg
.ha2l1el
.ha2lep
.ha2let
.ha2l1e2v
.ha2lis
.han2gad
.han2g1e
.ha2sor
.has3sz
.ha2tag
.ha2t1at
.ha2t1e2
.ha2told
.há2m1a
.há2ny1in
.háro2m1e
.há2t1alj
.há2tus
.há2zol
.há2zó
.he2i
.hé2t1ez
.hé2t1o
.hit1a
.hi2tis
.hodás1
.hol1l
.hol2t1e
.ho2ne
.hő2sá
.i2
.ike2r1i
.ikerü2
.ike2r1ülé
.ikon1s
.ima1s
.im1p2la
.in1aktí
.in2gin
.inte2r1a
.io2n1a2
.io2n1á
.io2ne
.ion3n
.ipa2re
.izo2m1ért
.í2
.íjá2t
.íj1áto
.ín1e
.írá2s1ág
.írá2s3z
.ív1a2
.ív1á2r
.ív1ell
.íz1a
.íz1in
.j2
.jaké2
.ja2kér
.ja2kov
.járműká2
.já2szá
.já2szó
.je2gy1a2
.je2gy1á2
.je2l1a
.je2leg
.je2lev
.job2b1ol
.jó2dal
.jó2s1e2
.jó2t1á
.k2
.kale2i
.ka2nar
.ka2n1e
.kapolc1
.ka2rala
.ka2ras
.ka2r1á2s
.kar2c3se
.kare2
.ka2rem
.ka2rék
.ka2ring
.ka2rí
.ka2ró2ra
.ka2r1ó2rák
.ka2r1ü
.ka1th
.ka1tz
.kár1a2d
.kás2
.kása3l
.ke2csó
.ke2l1á2
.ke2l1e2g
.ke2l1e2ve
.kel1ö
.ker2ta
.ké2nét
.ké2p1és
.kéta2
.ké2tab
.ké2tad
.ké2t1ag
.ké2taka
.ké2tal
.ké2tan
.ké2tap
.ké2tas
.ké2tat
.ké2tau
.ké2t1á2
.ké2t1ele
.ké2t1ez
.ké2t1o2
.kéze2
.ké2z1el
.ké2zem
.ké2zs
.kéz1z
.kiá2
.ki1g2
.ki1krá
.kió2
.ki2ság
.kiű2
.kla2uz
.kle2i
.kló2re
.ko2rác
.ko2rí
.ko2sis
.kó2d1a2
.kó2r1e
.kó2r1é2s
.kö2b1öl
.kö2d1ő
.kö2zis
.kö2z1ő
.köz1z
.kr2
.kun1a
.kvar3k.
.l2
.lak1a2d
.la2kal
.la2k1an
.la2kép
.la2kor
.la2kő
.lan2t1e
.lan2t1ó2
.la2pal
.la2p1ác
.la2p1á2r
.la2p1e2
.la2p1or
.la2p1osz
.la2pó
.lá2b1e2
.lá2bil
.lá2bor
.lán2c3s
.lá2nyan
.lá2ny1e2
.lá2p1e
.lá2p1il
.lá2z1ó2
.lá2z3s
.le3dé
.le2g1
.le3g2ali
.le3g2elés
.le3g2esle2g1
.le3g2esle3g2esle2g1
.lege2t
.le4géne
.leg3g
.le3gy
.lei2d
.leí2ro
.leí2ród
.leí2ru
.le1kl
.le1k2r
.lemez1z
.le1p2ré
.le1s2m
.le1t2r
.leü2
.lé2c3s
.lé2g1a2
.lé2g1á
.lége2
.lé2g1el
.lé2gér
.lé2go
.lé2gy1á2
.lé2p1a2
.lépü2
.lép1ülé
.lé2t1a2
.lé2t1á2
.lét1elek
.lé2t1e2lé
.lé2t1érd
.lé2tör
.lisz2ta
.lisz2t1á2
.lisz2ter
.lito1s
.lob1e
.lobi2
.lo2bin
.lo2mag
.lo2mal
.lo2m1á
.lom2b1e2
.lo2me
.lo2m1é2t
.lon2csi
.lófo2g1a2d
.lő2cs1ö2v
.lőrés3s
.ly1o
.m2
.ma2e
.ma2gal
.ma2gar
.ma2gál
.ma2g1e2
.mag1g
.magó2
.ma2gór
.ma2in.
.ma2r1ác
.ma2r1ing
.masz2k1or
.masz2k1ö
.ma1th
.ma2uz
.má2r1is
.me2g1e2
.me2g1é2
.meg1if
.mego2
.me2g1ő2
.me2i
.mel2lá
.me2ny1u2
.me2zá
.médi2af
.mé2ná
.mé2no
.mé2sza
.mé2szet
.mé2szi
.mé2szo
.mé2zis
.mi3rá
.mo2lyan
.műi2
.mű1kr
.mű1s
.n2
.na2gya
.na2gyá
.na2gye
.na2gyú
.na2pap
.na2p1ar
.na2pál
.na2p1e
.na2pés
.na2p1o2r
.na2pö
.ne2ma
.ne2meg
.ne2m1el
.ne2min
.ne2ol
.ne2szá
.net2t1a2
.ne2um
.né2gyá
.né2pa
.né2v1ál
.né2vel
.no2r1
.nya2k1á2ro
.nya2k1e2
.nya2k1ö2
.nyol2c1an
.o2
.oda1
.ok1a2d
.ok1a2l
.okka2
.ola2j1e2
.ola2sz1ó2
.olda2l1út
.or2r1aj
.or2r1alt
.or2ran
.or2r1e2
.orré2
.or2r1és
.or2v1a2
.or2vá
.or2v1é
.orvi2
.or2vis
.ot1tr
.ó2
.ólo2m1a
.óme3g2
.ón1a2
.ón1á2
.ón1e2
.ón1év
.óvá2s1árt
.ö2
.ön1d2
.ön1e2
.öni2
.ön1í
.ön1k2
.ön3n
.ön1o
.ön1ő
.ön1s
.ön1ü
.össz1a
.össz1á
.öte2
.öt1eg
.öt1el
.öt1t2
.öv1e2g
.öv1e2l
.öv1ő2
.ő2
.őa3l
.ői3r
.őr1ab
.őr1an
.őr1e2g
.őr1é2g
.őr1é2s
.őr1ist
.őr1o
.őr2s1ág
.őr1u2
.őr1üg
.ős1a2
.ős1á2
.ős1eg
.ős1e2l
.ős1e2r
.ős1e2s
.ős1é2g
.ős1ért
.ős1í2
.ős1o
.ős1ó2
.ős1p
.ős1tr
.ős1u2
.ős1ú
.ősz1a2
.ősz1á
.ősz1e2g
.ősz1el
.ősz1em
.ős3zene
.ős3zené
.őz1a2
.őz1eg
.őz1e2l
.őze2t
.őz1ete
.őz1ék
.őz1ére
.őz1ő
.őz3s
.őz1u
.p2
.pa2da
.pa2d1á2
.pa2din
.pa2d1ó2
.pa2i
.pa2par
.pa2pál
.pa2pe
.para1f2r
.parke2
.par2ker
.par2ta
.par2tel
.par2ter
.pá2c3s
.pán2ta
.pár2t1ö
.pen3ny
.pe2r1a2
.pe2r1á
.pe2r1enc
.pe2rok
.pe2rül
.pe2s
.pia2c3s
.pina1
.pin2t1ó
.ple2i
.ponta2
.pon2te
.po2rad
.po2ral
.po2ran
.po2rác
.po2rál
.po2re
.po2r1us
.pó2kis
.pó2k1ö
.pó2rás
.pó2t1e
.pó2t1é
.pre1k2
.prés3s
.proto1p2
.q2
.r2
.ra2b1as
.ra2b1á
.ra2be
.rabic1
.ra2b1il
.ra2b1i2z
.ra2bí
.ra2bor
.ra2bö
.ra2b1ő2
.ra2bú
.ra2gal
.ra2j1ö2
.rajtó2
.raj2t1ór
.rá2cs1á2z
.rá1dr
.rá1fr
.rá1gr
.rái2
.rán2c1e
.rány2
.rá1spr
.rá1s2t
.rát2
.rá1tk
.rá1tr
.re1k2re
.ren2d1a2
.ren2d1ő2
.re1p2ri
.rep2ro
.re1prod
.rete2k1
.ré2m1emb
.ré2mu
.ré3p2a
.ré2sa
.rés3szer
.ré2sza
.ré2szá2
.ré2sz1e2le
.ré2szell
.ré2szer
.ré2szí
.ré2szo
.ré2sző
.ré2t1a2
.ré2t1á2
.ré2v1á
.ré2zá
.ré2zel
.ré2zet
.ré2zis
.ré2z1o
.réz1z
.ri2zso
.rizs3z
.rí2má
.ro1c2kos
.romé2
.ro2m1ét
.ro2min
.ro2mis
.ros2t1e2
.rug1g
.ru2m1a
.ru2mil
.rú2de
.s2
.sa2h1a
.saj2te
.sa2s1or
.sa2vad
.sa2v1ara
.sa2v1ál
.sa2vári
.sa2v1e2
.sa2v1é2
.sá2r1ó
.sá2rú
.sás1s
.sá2s3z
.sá2v1a
.sá2vá
.sá2vó
.sc2
.se2bal
.se2b1á
.se2bel
.se2besz
.se2b1o
.sé2fi
.s3gr
.si2em
.si2ók
.sín3n
.sí2p1ő2
.sí2r1a2
.sí2rát
.sk2
.so2kél
.so2kil
.so2kis
.so2kol
.so2m1ag
.so2mat
.so1ny2
.so2ral
.so2rál
.sör1e2g
.sp2
.spor2t1á2
.st2
.star2t1a2
.sz2
.szaba2d1e
.sza2k1at
.sza2k1ás
.sza2k1e
.sza2kö
.sza2k1ü
.szá2l1ó2
.száz1z
.szeg1ér.
.sze2gí
.sze2i
.sze2m1á
.sze2m1ér.
.sze2m1é2ri
.sze2r1ág
.szer2v1a2d
.szer2v1e2v
.sze2szá
.sze2szeg
.sze2sz1ó2
.szé2fa
.szén1n
.szé2t1
.széte2
.szín3n
.szk2
.szo2l1ó
.szókész1
.szó2szak
.szószö2
.szó2sz1öv
.szt2
.t2
.ta2gal
.ta2g1a2r
.ta2g1á
.ta2g1e
.ta2gép
.tag1g
.ta2g1i2n
.ta2gö
.ta2nag
.ta2n1as
.ta2nál
.tan1d2
.ta2n1e2
.ta2n1év
.tané2ve
.ta2nis
.tan1n
.ta2n1ó2
.tant2
.ta2n1u2s
.ta3rá
.ta2t1ál
.ta2t1árai
.ta2t1e2
.ta2t1í
.ta2tor
.ta2tur
.tá2l1ó2
.tán2cse
.tá2p1ol
.tár2sor
.tár2s1ö2
.tár2t1es
.tár2t1ölt
.tá2v1a
.távi2
.tá2v1ir
.tbc1
.te2aka
.te2ar
.te2j1á2
.te2j1eg
.terape2
.ter2v1a2
.ter2v1á2
.tes2ték
.tes2t1öl
.tetraé2
.teza2
.té3k
.té2nyem
.té2nyí
.té2ra
.té2rá
.té2ret
.tér1int
.tí2z1ó2
.tí2zs
.tízü2
.to2káro
.tol2le
.topa3u2
.to2r1á2l
.to2r1odv
.tor2z3se
.tó1st
.tó2t1ér.
.tön2k1a
.tőa2
.tőe2
.tő2gya
.tő2r1éss
.tő2r1é2sz
.tra2u
.turnus1s
.tus3s
.tu2sz
.tus3zá
.tú2r1att
.tű2z1ért
.tű2z1ő2r
.tű2zse
.tyú2ka
.u2
.ugrás1s
.un1in
.uni2o
.utas1s
.utás4
.uto2
.utó2d1ö
.ú2
.új1as
.új1e
.úr1a2
.úr1á2
.úr1e
.úszós2
.úszó1sp
.út1a2
.út1á2
.út1e2
.út1ol
.út1ő
.út1ü2
.ü2
.ügy1ér.
.ük1a2
.üstö2l
.üs2t1ölő
.ütőkész1
.üve2g1e2l
.ű2
.űr1a2
.űr1á2
.űr1e2
.űr1é2s
.űr1éte
.űri2
.űr1ita
.űr1öss
.űr1s
.űrt2
.v2
.va2d1al
.va2dár
.va2dét
.va2d1o2r
.va2dóv
.va2d1ö
.va2d3z
.va2gy1i
.va2j1e
.va2k1ak
.va2kal
.va2k1an
.va2kap
.va2k1ár
.va2k1e2
.va2k1ö
.va2rak
.va2r1á2s
.va2r1e2
.va2r1ing
.va2sab
.va2sar
